Illinois, session 104th, SB1753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 4represented in the General Assembly: 5    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Ensuring Essential Services Act. 7    Section 5. Findings and purposes. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds that the State of Illinois 9administers a program for the provision of home and 10community-based support services for individuals with 11developmental disabilities (IDD) in accordance with a waiver 12program agreement entered into between the State and the 13Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Pursuant to a 14consent decree entered in Ligas v. Hamos, Case No. 151:05-cv-04331 (N.D. Ill.), the State is required to implement 16sufficient measures to ensure the availability of IDD 17services, supports, and other resources of sufficient quality, 18scope, and variety to meet the State's obligations under the 19consent decree and the implementation plan consistent with 20such choices. The number of individuals served each year by 21the program is based on available State appropriation levels.22    The General Assembly finds that the Department of Human 23Services is designated as the State agency having primary   SB1753- 2 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1responsibility for overseeing the delivery of habilitation 2services to individuals with developmental disabilities under 3the program, and in that capacity procures services for 4approximately 27,000 Illinoisans who, together with their 5families and guardians, depend on the daily and uninterrupted 6provision of these services so that they can attend to the 7necessities of life. An interruption in the delivery of 8services under the program would have disastrous consequences 9for participants, their families, and their communities.10    The General Assembly finds that effects of the ongoing 11COVID-19 pandemic, which has claimed hundreds of thousands of 12American lives and disrupted the distribution of essential 13services to the most needy inhabitants of the State has 14affected the provision of services in unforeseen ways, 15exacerbating already existing labor shortage high turnover, 16and causing labor unrest and stoppages. 17    The General Assembly finds that there currently exists an 18acute shortage of frontline and direct support staff 19indicating that the agencies with which the State has 20contracted to provide IDD services under the program have 21inadequately ensured the training, retention, and recruitment 22of the workforce necessary to meet the State's obligations 23under the program, and such shortage and existing labor 24conditions escalate the probability of disruptions in the 25delivery of essential services owing to labor disputes and 26employee dissatisfaction.  SB1753- 3 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1    The General Assembly finds that as a procurer of services 2comprising the program the State administers, either in the 3form of purchase of service contracts, grants, or otherwise, 4that the State has a proprietary interest in assuring the 5delivery of quality, reliable, and uninterrupted provision of 6services to individuals receiving benefits under the program.7    The General Assembly finds that a strike, labor dispute, 8or other inability to deliver essential service under the 9program would be costly to the State as it struggles to fill 10the gap to provide these essential services, due to the 11excessive cost of locating alternative treatment options on an 12emergent basis, including, but not limited to, the need to pay 13substantial overtime to employees at public hospitals which 14would be forced to admit increasing numbers of patients as a 15matter of last resort. Such disruptions would have 16consequential and dire effects on program recipients, their 17families, and guardians.18     The General Assembly finds that agreements between 19employers and labor organizations to refrain from resolving 20labor disputes through economic action promote the efficient 21and uninterrupted delivery of services. Such agreements are 22common and have been adopted within the behavioral health and 23disability support industries. A program of labor management 24cooperation has proven effective in addressing issues related 25to establishing appropriate wages and compensation, improving 26quality of care, increasing worker retention, reducing   SB1753- 4 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1workforce turnover, and mitigating the likelihood of service 2disruption.3    (b) The purpose of this Act is to ensure the State meets 4its obligation to provide these essential services at 5consistent quality levels in accordance with its waiver 6agreement with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, 7all while allocating scarce taxpayer resources. The State, as 8procurer of home and community-based support services, has 9determined to take steps to ensure the uninterrupted delivery 10of services to individuals receiving IDD services under the 11program.  12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 13    "Agency" means a private entity, including a non-profit 14corporation, other than a corporation established in 15accordance with the Religious Corporation Act, that has 16contracted with the Department of Human Services to provide 17direct care services under the Home and Community-Based 18Services Waiver Program for Persons with Developmental 19Disabilities.20    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 21Illinois and its agents or designees.22    "Contract" means the written agreement entered into 23between an agency and the Department of Human Services (or any 24other State entity) establishing the terms and conditions for 25the provision of, and payment for services under the program,   SB1753- 5 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1and shall include, but is not limited to, fee-for-service, 2service purchase contracts, or grants.3    "Frontline and direct support staff" means an employee of 4an agency who performs the direct care, support, educational, 5training and case management, and other services integral to 6the delivery of the services required of the agency under its 7contract with the Department of Human Services and funded by 8the program. This includes, but is not limited to, direct 9support personnel, qualified intellectual disability 10personnel, employment specialists, and early intervention 11specialists.12    "Labor peace agreement" means a written agreement between 13an agency and a labor organization that contains, at a 14minimum, provisions under which the parties agree to refrain 15from actions intended to or having the effect of disrupting or 16interrupting services and also provides for an expedient 17mechanism for the binding resolution of disputes between them.18    "Labor organization" means an organization defined under 1929 U.S.C. 152(5) that has as its members frontline and direct 20support staff.21    "Program" means the Home and Community-Based Services 22Waiver Program for Adults with Developmental Disabilities that 23is funded through a waiver authorized under Section 1915(c) of 24the federal Social Security Act and that is administered by 25the Department of Human Services' Division of Developmental 26Disabilities. Services under the program include, but are not   SB1753- 6 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1limited to, community integrated living arrangements, 2community living facilities of 16 or fewer individuals, 3home-based support services, day programs, and therapies. 4"Program" also includes newly developed programs and settings 5that are funded through the Home and Community-Based Services 6Waiver Program for Persons with Developmental Disabilities.7    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Human Services. 8    Section 15. Assurance of uninterrupted delivery of 9services. 10    (a) Any contract entered into between the Department of 11Human Services and an agency shall include a provision 12assuring the State of the uninterrupted delivery of the 13contracted-for services.14    (b) The assurance required under subsection (a) shall 15provide that the agency has entered into a binding labor peace 16agreement with any labor organization that is the exclusive 17representative of the agency's frontline and direct support 18staff or, where no exclusive representation has been 19established, that the agency has or will enter into an 20agreement with any labor organization that seeks to become the 21agency's frontline and direct support staff's exclusive 22representative. 23    (c) The assurance required under subsection (a) shall 24become a condition of any contract entered into, renewed, or 25amended on or after the effective date of this Act.   SB1753- 7 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1    Section 20. Implementation. 2    (a) To the extent necessary to effectuate the requirements 3of this Act, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 4shall submit the necessary application to the federal Centers 5for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver or State Plan 6amendment to allow implementation of the contracting 7requirements established in this Act. The application shall be 8submitted no later than 90 days after the effective date of 9this Act. The provisions of this Act shall apply during the 10pendency of any such application. 11    (b) No later than 60 days after the effective date of this 12Act, the Department of Human Services shall adopt rules 13implementing the requirements of this Act. Specifically, the 14Department of Human Services shall adopt contract addenda 15terms and attestations sufficient to satisfy the requirements 16of this Section and a means of informing agencies of the 17requirements of the Act and any other rules necessary to 18implement Section 25.19    (c) The Department of Human Services shall include in each 20contract and in each solicitation for a contract:21        (1) a requirement that the agency comply with all 22    applicable requirements under this Act and any rules 23    adopted in accordance with this Act, and that such 24    requirements constitute a material term of the contract; 25    and  SB1753- 8 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1        (2) a provision providing that:2            (A) failure to comply with the requirements of 3        this Section may constitute a material breach by the 4        agency of the terms of the contract;5            (B) such failure shall be determined by the 6        Comptroller; and7            (C) if the agency receives written notice of a 8        breach and fails to cure such breach, the State shall 9        have the right to pursue any rights or remedies 10        available under the terms of the contract or under 11        applicable law, including termination of the contract 12        attendant to transition of services to qualified 13        agencies.14    (d) The Department of Human Services shall amend 59 Ill. 15Adm. Code Part 120 to clarify that compliance with this Act 16shall be a requirement for both initial certification and 17recertification with respect to services provided by frontline 18and direct support staff under the program.  19    Section 25. Enforcement. 20    (a) The contractual assurance required under Section 15 21shall be a qualification to participate in the program and a 22continuing obligation of each agency during the term of its 23contract.24    (b) Each agency shall report to the Department of Human 25Services, on a form to be adopted by the Department of Human   SB1753- 9 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1Services, its compliance with the contractual assurance 2required under this Act at each of the following times:3        (1) if the assurance gives rise to an obligation on 4    the part of an agency to enter into a labor peace agreement 5    and such agency has not entered into such an agreement;6        (2) if an agency's existing agreement meeting the 7    requirements of a labor peace agreement lapses or expires; 8    and9        (3) on the anniversary date of the contract's 10    effective date.11    The report shall include a copy of any agreement that 12satisfies the assurance or shall state in writing or shall be 13signed under penalty of perjury that the agency is unaware of 14any circumstances giving rise to an obligation to enter into 15any labor peace agreement. 16    (c) If an agency fails to submit to the Department of Human 17Services the reports required under this Section, or if the 18Department of Human Services otherwise learns of a failure on 19the part of an agency to meet its contractual obligations, the 20Department of Human Services shall take the following remedial 21actions: 22        (1) Inform the agency and the Comptroller of its lack 23    of compliance and provide a 30-day notice to correct the 24    deficiency.25        (2) Investigate and assist the agency by providing a 26    plan of correction.  SB1753- 10 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1        (3) If, after 30 days from the date of the Department 2    of Human Services' notice, it is determined the agency is 3    out of compliance, the Department of Human Services shall 4    issue a notice of nonrenewal to the agency, which shall 5    provide the basis for the disqualification, upon which the 6    Department of Human Services shall ensure continuity of 7    care, transition of services, and placement referrals to 8    qualified agencies upon the expiration of the term of the 9    contract. The Department of Human Services shall notify 10    the Comptroller of the notice of nonrenewal within 14 11    days.12        (4) The Department of Human Services shall require 13    that an agency that receives a notice of nonrenewal shall 14    be ineligible for recertification or relicensure, provided 15    the agency is afforded notice and an opportunity to appeal 16    in accordance with the processes under Subpart C of Part 17    104 of Title 89 of the Illinois Administrative Code, the 18    sole issue at hearing, in which any interested party may 19    participate, shall be whether the agency is in compliance 20    with the requirements of this Act.21        (5) After receiving a notice of nonrenewal for an 22    Agency, the Comptroller shall cease distribution of all 23    State funds to the Agency. The Comptroller shall continue 24    to withhold payments unless and until the Agency 25    successfully appeals the notice of nonrenewal as described 26    in paragraph (4).   SB1753- 11 -LRB104 09758 KTG 19824 b1    Section 30. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 2its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 3the invalidity of that provision or application does not 4affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 5be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 6    Section 35. Construction of Act. Nothing in this Act shall 7be construed to require any agency to enter into an agreement 8that contains terms or under circumstances that violate the 9National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 151 et seq., as 10amended. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 122025.